Mississippi, session 2026, SB3055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the support and maintenance of the Alcorn State University Agricultural Research, Extension, and Land-Grant Programs for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................................ $     8,161,869.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby authorized for expenditure out of any special source funds which are collected by or otherwise become available, for the support and maintenance of the Alcorn State University Agricultural Research, Extension, and Land-Grant Programs for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027................ ............................................ $ 335,000.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2 of this act, Three Hundred Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($335,000.00) shall be derived from funds in the Education Enhancement Fund deposited pursuant to Sections 27-65-75 and 27-67-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a matter as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided for the following: (a)  Agency Operations...................... $ 170,000.00. (b)  Poultry Sciences Academic Research Center.......................................... $ 165,000.00. SECTION 4.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) is provided for the Poultry Sciences Academic Research Center. SECTION 5.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Seven Hundred Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($715,000.00) is provided for Agricultural Research and Extension including poultry science, animal science, and environmental science programs. SECTION 6.  No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 7.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2028 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2027 budget request process. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 10.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed from and after June 30, 2026.